Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-133
Domestic company; certificate of authority; suspension or revocation; appeal.

Whenever any of the grounds mentioned in section 44-4809, 44-4812, or 44-4817 are shown to exist as to a domestic company after a hearing upon notice to the company, the Department of Insurance may suspend or revoke the certificate of authority of such company to do business, instead of applying to the court, which order of suspension or revocation shall be subject to appeal, and the appeal shall be in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act.

Laws 1913, c. 154, § 12, p. 403;

R.S.1913, § 3148;

Laws 1919, c. 190, tit. V, art. III, § 5, p. 581;

C.S.1922, § 7749;

C.S.1929, § 44-205;

R.S.1943, § 44-133;

Laws 1969, c. 359, § 4, p. 1269;

Laws 1988, LB 352, § 39;

Laws 1989, LB 319, § 65.

Administrative Procedure Act, see section 84-920.

Under this section, Department of Insurance may revoke, upon notice, authority of domestic insurance company to do business. Clark v. Lincoln Liberty Life Ins. Co., 139 Neb. 65, 296 N.W. 449 (1941).